District of Columbia statutes.
42-501

Recognized estates.

Estates in land in the District shall be estates of inheritance, estates for life, estates for years, estates at will, and estates by sufferance.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1350, ch. 854, § 1011

Cross References

Statute of frauds, see §§ 28-3501, 28-3503.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-201.
1973 Ed., § 45-801.